Hawaii statutes.
§447-7 Filing of false information;
revocation of license. The board of dental examiners shall refuse to grant
a license to any applicant or shall revoke the license of any person who
knowingly records, registers, or files, or offers for recordation, registration,
or filing with the department of commerce and consumer affairs any written
statement which has been falsely made, completed, or altered, or in which a
false entry has been made, or which contains a false statement or false
information. [L 1920, c 7, §6; RL 1925, §1088; RL 1935, §1006; RL 1945, §2187;
RL 1955, §62-7; HRS §447-7; am L 1986, c 151, §3]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next